Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202619-5702
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Municipality Infrastructure Aid Act:

(1) Eligible grantee means a city of the first class, city of the second class, or village with a redevelopment plan approved under the Community Development Law;

(2) Infrastructure includes water systems, sewer systems, roads, bridges, and other site development activities; and

(3) Program means the Municipality Infrastructure Aid Program created in section 19-5703.

Laws 2024, LB600, § 2.

Community Development Law, see section 18-2101.